csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_am.yaml
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandanziiminaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandanziiminaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandanziiminaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandanziiminaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
